Maryland, session 2025, HB0209.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Finance and Procurement
[3.5–405.
(a) This section does not apply to municipal governments.
(b) In a manner and frequency established in regulations adopted by the
Department, each county government, local school system, and local health department
shall in consultation with the local emergency manager, create or update a cybersecurity
preparedness and response plan and complete a cybersecurity preparedness assessment.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 3.5–406 and
3.5–407 of Article – State Finance and Procurement of the Annotated Code of Maryland be
renumbered to be Section(s) 3.5–405 and 3.5–406, respectively.
– 1 –

Ch. 166 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, April 22, 2025.
– 2 –